Rhode Island statutes. Title 19 Financial Institutions
Chapter 5 Credit Unions

19-5-1.
“Credit union” defined.

In this chapter, the term “credit union” means a cooperative association formed for the purpose of promoting thrift among its members and offering opportunities for members to use and control their own money in order to improve their economic and social condition.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 43.

19-5-2.
Incorporation.

Fifteen (15) or more citizens of this state who have associated themselves by a written agreement to form a credit union may, with the consent of the director, or the director’s designee, become a corporation upon complying with the provisions of §§

7-6-33

—

7-6-35

. The subscribers to the agreement to form shall give notice in writing to the director, or the director’s designee, of their intention to form a credit union by filing a copy of the agreement to form with the director, or the director’s designee. If the director, or the director’s designee, finds:

That the agreement to form is in conformity with law;

That the conditions under which the credit union is to be established do not render unlikely the successful financial operation; and

That the standing of the proposed members is such as to give assurance that its affairs will be administered in accordance with the spirit of this section and that the formation will benefit the proposed membership,

the director, or the director’s designee, may issue an authorization to commence operations.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 43.

19-5-3.
Membership of credit unions.

After organization of any credit union has been completed, nothing in this chapter shall be construed to debar from membership any fraternal organization, voluntary association, partnership, or corporation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 43.

19-5-4.
Contents of bylaws.

The director, or the director’s designee, shall promulgate regulations that prescribe the form and content of the credit union’s bylaws that shall, if not contrary to state law, reflect the guidelines of the federal credit union model bylaws and amendment provisions.

No credit union seeking formation shall operate until the time the director, or the director’s designee, has approved the bylaws. Amendments to the bylaws shall not be operative until approved by the director, or the director’s designee. Any credit union aggrieved by the decision of the director, or the director’s designee, shall have the right to appeal pursuant to chapter 35 of title 42.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 43.

19-5-5.
Shares or deposits held jointly.

Whenever payment for shares or deposits has been made in any credit union in the name of two (2) or more persons and payable to either, or any, or the survivor, payment of the amount due on the shares or deposits, or any part, or any interest, or dividend may be made to any of the persons, whether the other or others are living or not, or to the survivor or survivors of them, or to the guardian, executor, or administrator of them, and the receipt of the person or persons so paid shall be a valid and sufficient release and discharge on account of the payment so made. Nothing in this section authorizes the receipt of savings either in payment for share or on deposit in the name of two (2) or more persons unless at least one of the persons is or becomes a member of the credit union.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 43.

19-5-6.
Demand deposits.

A credit union may offer demand deposits to its members provided the following conditions are met:

That the credit union has shares and deposits of one million dollars ($1,000,000) or more;

Every credit union shall maintain reserves as required by the provisions with respect to reserve funds and reserve balances contained in the Federal Reserve Act, 12 U.S.C. § 221 et seq., and in the rules, regulations, orders, and rulings from time to time in force of the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System; and

That the credit union obtain the approval of the director, or the director’s designee, prior to accepting demand deposits, that approval to be conditioned on compliance with the above requirements and on the soundness of the condition and operation of the credit union.

If at any time the credit union ceases to comply with subdivisions (1) through (3) above, the director, or the director’s designee, may, upon thirty (30) days’ notice and after an opportunity to be heard, withdraw the authority of the credit union to accept demand deposits. Upon withdrawal the credit union shall accept no further sums to be credited to any demand deposit. After two (2) months from the date of withdrawal of authority, the credit union shall cease to maintain demand deposits.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 43; P.L. 2002, ch. 235, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 390, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 110, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 127, § 1.

19-5-7.
Voting rights.

No person shall be entitled to vote at any meeting who has not been a member of the credit union for more than three (3) months, but this restriction shall not apply during the first year of the existence of the credit union, nor shall it apply during the first three (3) months of the second year to any member who was a member at the end of the first year and who has been a member continuously since that time. No member shall have more than one vote, and no member shall be permitted to vote by proxy, unless expressly authorized by the bylaws or except as otherwise provided in this chapter. Any fraternal organization, voluntary association, partnership, or corporation holding membership may, by duly authorized agent, cast one vote at any meeting, but that agent shall not be eligible to election as an officer or as a member of the board of directors, credit committee, or supervisory committee unless that agent holds membership, as an individual, in the credit union.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 43.

19-5-8.
Election and terms of directors.

At the annual meeting, the members shall elect a board of directors, the number of which shall be fixed from time to time by the bylaws, provided, however, that there shall be a minimum of five (5) directors. The directors shall be elected to staggered three (3) year terms so that one-third (1/3) of the whole number, or a close approximation of one-third (1/3), shall be elected at each succeeding annual meeting.

In case of any increase in the number of directors, the length of the initial term of the new director(s) shall be determined in accordance with the requirement that one-third (1/3) of the whole number, or a close approximation of one-third (1/3), shall be elected at each succeeding annual meeting.

No more than two (2) employees of the credit union shall be permitted to serve as members of the board of directors at any one time.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 43; P.L. 2001, ch. 369, § 2.

19-5-9.
Appointments and terms of supervisory committee members.

The board of directors shall appoint, or the membership shall elect, qualified members to a supervisory committee consisting of no fewer than three (3) members nor more than five (5) members. The director, or the director’s designee, shall issue guidelines defining a “qualified” supervisory committee member. No officers, directors, or employees of the credit union, or immediate family members thereof, shall be members of the supervisory committee.

Members of the supervisory committee shall be appointed by the board of directors or elected by the membership for no fewer than one nor more than three (3) years, as the bylaws provide. An equal number of members, as nearly as may be, shall be appointed or elected each year.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 43.

19-5-10.
Credit committee.

If the bylaws provide for a credit committee, then pursuant to the provisions of the bylaws, the board of directors may appoint, or the members may elect, a credit committee which shall consist of an odd number of members of the credit union. The method used shall be set forth in the bylaws.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 43; P.L. 2011, ch. 347, § 2; P.L. 2011, ch. 387, § 2.

19-5-11.
Duplication of office prohibited — Oaths of office — Record of qualification.

No member of the board of directors, credit committee, supervisory committee, or committees appointed by the board of directors shall serve at the same time as an official in any position of another unaffiliated credit union that is under the supervision of the director. No member of the board of directors shall be a member of either the supervisory committee or the credit committee, nor shall one person be a member of more than one of those committees; all members of those committees, as well as all officers whom they may elect, shall be sworn and shall hold their offices until others are elected and qualified in their place; and a record of every qualification shall be filed and preserved with the records of the credit union.

Every director, credit committee member, and supervisory committee member, when appointed or elected, shall take an oath that he or she will, so far as the duty devolves on him or her, diligently and honestly administer the affairs of the credit union, and will not knowingly violate, or willingly permit to be violated, any of the provisions of this title. This oath shall be immediately transmitted to the director, or the director’s designee, and shall be filed and preserved in the director’s office.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 43.

19-5-12.
Powers and duties of directors.

The board of directors shall be responsible for the general management of the affairs, funds, and records of the credit union, and shall meet as often as necessary. It shall be the board’s special powers and duties:

To act upon the expulsion of members;

To approve or ratify the rate of interest that shall be allowed on deposits;

To fill vacancies in the board of directors, the supervisory committee, and in the credit committee of the credit union until the election and qualification of officers and directors to fill those vacancies is completed;

To make recommendations to members relative to the maximum number of shares that may be held by any one member, amendments to the bylaws, and any other matters that, in their opinion, the members should decide;

To borrow, on behalf of the credit union, and to pledge as security the bonds, notes, mortgages, or other securities of the credit union; provided, however, that this borrowing shall not exceed fifty percent (50%) of the assets of the credit union, unless the director, or the director’s designee, shall give his or her written approval;

To declare dividends as provided in this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 43.

19-5-13.
Loan applications.

The credit committee or duly appointed loan officer shall approve, in writing, every loan or advance made by the credit union, subject to any limitations that may be set from time to time by the board of directors. Every application for a loan shall be made in writing and shall state the purpose for which the loan is desired and the security offered. No loan shall be made unless the credit committee or loan officer is satisfied that it promises to benefit the borrower, nor unless it has been approved by the committee or duly appointed loan officer in accordance with applicable credit union bylaw provisions. The applicant for a loan may appeal the decision of the credit committee or loan officer to the board of directors. If written approval of the credit committee or loan officer is obtained, nothing contained in this section shall prevent a credit union from extending credit to a member in any manner in which it sees fit; provided that no extension of credit shall be made upon an unsecured revolving credit plan, line of credit, or letter of credit in which the credit authorization exceeds five thousand dollars ($5,000), unless the credit authorization is reviewed at least annually by the credit committee, if one exists, or by the board of directors.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 43; P.L. 2000, ch. 148, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 347, § 2; P.L. 2011, ch. 387, § 2.

19-5-14.
Powers and duties of supervisory committee.

The supervisory committee shall make, or cause to be made, an annual audit and shall submit a report of that audit to the board of directors and a summary of the report to the members at the next annual meeting of the credit union.

Following a detailed investigation performed by the supervisory committee that leads the supervisory committee to reasonably conclude that a violation of this chapter or of the bylaws, or any practice of the credit union is unsafe or unauthorized, the supervisory committee, by unanimous vote, may suspend the credit committee, any director, or any officers elected by the board of directors. Written notice of any such suspension shall be given to the director, or the director’s designee, and the deposit insuring agency by registered mail or hand-delivery within twenty-four (24) hours of the vote to suspend. The suspension shall remain in place until the next meeting of the credit union membership called pursuant to its bylaws.

If the supervisory committee of a credit union is elected by the membership, the supervisory committee shall fill vacancies in its own number until the next annual meeting of the credit union members. If the supervisory committee of a credit union is appointed by the board of directors, the board of directors shall fill vacancies in accordance with the credit union’s bylaws.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 43; P.L. 1997, ch. 98, § 5; P.L. 2006, ch. 622, § 1.

19-5-15.
Investment of funds — Powers.

The capital, deposits, and surplus of the credit union shall be lent to the members for the purposes and upon the security and terms as the credit committee shall approve, as authorized by a written loan policy, duly adopted by the board of directors. Funds not used in loans to members may be deposited in authorized reserve agents, or invested in the same manner as allowed by the national credit union administration rules and regulations, or in the following manner:

Without limitation, in securities issued as direct obligations of the United States government and in securities guaranteed by the United States government, or an agency thereof, as to principal and interest, and in any trust or trusts established for investing directly or collectively in these securities only;

An amount not exceeding one third (1/3) of the assets may be invested in:

Investments other than those described above but that are legal for the investment of funds of financial institutions of this state, subject to the same limitations and restrictions by which financial institutions are governed, provided that credit unions with assets of less than ten million dollars ($10,000,000) may not invest pursuant to the “prudent person” provisions.

Deposits in financial institutions incorporated under the laws of this state or under federal law and doing business in this state or in those other institutions that may be approved by the director, or the director’s designee.

Any corporation incorporated by CUNA International, Inc. or its successor, or any associated or subsidiary corporation, for the purpose of providing investment opportunity for credit unions, or any investment or interlending program managed or sponsored by any of these corporations; provided that deposit or investment under this subsection shall be made only after the director, or the director’s designee, has approved the corporation for investment, or the investment or interlending program.

Common or preferred stocks other than those permitted above to the extent of not over five percent (5%) of the assets of investing credit unions with assets less than ten million dollars ($10,000,000) and to the extent of not over ten percent (10%) of the assets of investing credit unions with assets of ten million dollars ($10,000,000) or more; provided, however, that any of these securities shall be listed on a national stock exchange or on the National Market System of the NASDAQ stock market; that dividends have been paid by the corporation issuing the security and any predecessor corporation or corporations for at least four (4) of the last five (5) years; that the issuing corporation has, as shown by its last audited statement, total assets of at least one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000), and a stockholders’ equity of not less than forty percent (40%) of the amount of its total assets; and provided, further, that the security shall have been approved for investment by the director, or the director’s designee. The director, or the director’s designee, shall have absolute discretion in approving individual securities, provided they meet the requirements set forth above. No credit union shall invest in securities under the terms of this subdivision unless it shall have at least one million dollars ($1,000,000) in total assets as shown by its last annual report. No credit union shall invest more than one percent (1%) of its assets in any one security under the terms of this section.

Funds not used in loans to members may be invested in capital shares, obligations, preferred stock issues of any agency or association organized either as a stock company, mutual association, or membership corporation, provided the membership or stockholding, as the case may be, of the agency or association is confined or restricted to credit unions or organizations of credit unions, and provided the purposes for which the agency or association is organized are designed to serve or otherwise assist credit union operations and provided the investment is authorized by law or regulation for federal credit unions, including, without limitation, an investment in credit union service organizations (“CUSO”) as described in subsection (2)(vi).

Subject to the department of business regulation and the National Credit Union Administration’s power to limit any CUSO activities or services at any time based upon supervisory, legal or safety and soundness reasons or to refuse to permit any CUSO activities or services, a credit union may invest in, loan to, and/or contract with only those CUSOs that are sufficiently bonded or insured for their specific operations and engaged in the preapproved activities and services related to the routine daily operations of credit unions. The director, or director’s designee, shall promulgate regulations delineating specific preapproved activities and criteria.

In applying the limitations and restrictions as to percentages prescribed in the law governing investments by financial institutions, percentages shall be computed based on the total assets of the credit union;

Every credit union shall have the power to exercise, by its board of directors or duly authorized officers or agents, all incidental powers necessary to carry on the business of a credit union including, but not limited to, the power:

To receive, upon deposit and for safekeeping, property of every description, upon terms prescribed by the credit union and to construct, own, lease, and maintain safe deposit vaults, with suitable boxes and places for the reception and deposit of the property, and lease the use of these places and boxes to individuals and corporations, upon those terms that the credit union may prescribe. The credit union shall in no case incur any liability on account of the deposit of any property so made with it, or by reason of the leasing of any place of deposit, other than that liability as the credit union shall expressly assume in each case by the terms of the contract or receipt under which it shall accept the deposit or shall have let the place of deposit;

To act as a depositary of public money or a financial agent;

To purchase, sell, and pledge eligible obligations and assets as set forth in §

19-5-15.1

; and

To exercise additional powers, not inconsistent with the carrying on of a credit union business, with the approval of the director, or the director’s designee.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 43; P.L. 1999, ch. 71, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 347, § 2; P.L. 2011, ch. 387, § 2.

19-5-15.1.
Purchase, sale and pledge of eligible obligations and assets.

For purposes of this section:

“Eligible obligation” means a loan or group or portfolio of loans and includes a participation interest in a loan or group or portfolio of loans.

“Participation interest” means a loan where one or more federally insured financial institutions or federally insured credit unions participate pursuant to a written agreement with the originating lender.

“Student loan” means a loan granted to finance the borrower’s attendance at an institution of higher education or at a vocational school that is secured by and on which payment of the outstanding principal and interest has been deferred in accordance with the insurance or guarantee of the federal government, of a state government, or any agency of either.

Purchase.

A credit union may purchase, in whole or in part, within the limitations of the board of directors’ written purchase policies:

Eligible obligations of its members, from any source, if either:

They are loans it is empowered to grant; or

They are refinanced with the consent of the borrowers, within sixty (60) days after they are purchased, so that they are loans it is empowered to grant;

Eligible obligations of a liquidating credit union’s individual members, from the liquidating credit union;

Student loans, from any source, if the purchaser is granting student loans on an ongoing basis and if the purchase will facilitate the purchasing credit union’s packaging of a pool of such loans to be sold or pledged on the secondary market;

Real estate-secured loans, from any source, if the purchaser is granting real estate-secured loans on an ongoing basis and if the purchase will facilitate the purchasing credit union’s packaging of a pool of such loans to be sold or pledged on the secondary mortgage market. A pool must include a substantial portion of the credit union’s members’ loans and must be sold promptly;

Participation interests in loans made by federally-insured financial institutions or federally-insured credit unions; and

An indirect lending or indirect leasing arrangement shall be classified as a loan and is not the purchase of an eligible obligation because the credit union makes the final underwriting decision and the sales or lease contract is assigned to the credit union very soon after it is signed by the member and the dealer or leasing company.

A credit union may make purchases in accordance with this section (b), provided:

The board of directors approves the purchase;

A written agreement and schedule of the eligible obligations covered by the agreement are retained in the purchaser’s office;

For purchases under paragraph (b)(1)(ii) of this section, any advance written approval required by the National Credit Union Administration is obtained before consummation of such purchase; and

For purchases under paragraph (b)(1)(v) of this section, fifteen (15) business days prior written notice is given to the director, or the director’s designee. Such notice shall set forth such information as the director, or the director’s designee, shall from time to time require. In the event the director, or the director’s designee, fails to object to the proposed purchase within the fifteen (15) business day notice period, the purchase shall be deemed approved.

The aggregate of the unpaid balance of eligible obligations purchased under paragraph (b) of this section shall not exceed five percent (5%) of the unimpaired capital and surplus of the purchaser. The following may be excluded in calculating this five percent (5%) limitation:

Student loans purchased in accordance with paragraph (b)(1)(iii) of this section;

Real estate loans purchased in accordance with paragraph (b)(1)(iv) of this section; and

Eligible obligations purchased in accordance with paragraph (b)(1)(i) of this section that are refinanced by the purchaser so that it is a loan it is empowered to grant.

Sale. A credit union may sell, in whole or in part, to any source, eligible obligations of its members, eligible obligations purchased in accordance with paragraph (b)(1)(ii) of this section, student loans purchased in accordance with paragraph (b)(1)(iii) of this section, and real estate loans purchased in accordance with paragraph (b)(1)(iv) of this section, within the limitations of the board of directors’ written sale policies, provided:

The board of directors approves the sale; and

A written agreement and a schedule of the eligible obligations covered by the agreement are retained in the seller’s office.

Pledge.

A credit union may pledge, in whole or in part, to any source, eligible obligations of its members, eligible obligations purchased in accordance with paragraph (b)(1)(ii) of this section, student loans purchased in accordance with paragraph (b)(1)(iii) of this section, and real estate loans purchased in accordance with paragraph (b)(1)(iv) of this section, within the limitations of the board of directors’ written pledge policies, provided:

The board of directors approves the pledge;

Copies of the original loan documents are retained; and

A written agreement covering the pledging arrangement is retained in the office of the credit union that pledges the eligible obligations.

The pledge agreement shall identify the eligible obligations covered by the agreement.

Servicing. A credit union may agree to service any eligible obligation it purchases or sells in whole or in part.

Ten percent (10 %) limitation. The total indebtedness owing to any credit union by any person, inclusive of retained and reacquired interests, shall not exceed ten percent (10%) of its unimpaired capital and surplus.

Conflicts of interest.

No credit union official, employee, or his or her immediate family member may receive, directly or indirectly, any compensation in connection with that credit union’s purchase, sale, or pledge of an eligible obligation under the provisions of this section.

Permissible payments. This section does not prohibit:

A credit union’s payment of salary to employees;

A credit union’s payment of an incentive or bonus to an employee based on the credit union’s overall financial performance;

A credit union’s payment of an incentive or bonus to an employee, other than a senior management employee, in connection with that credit union’s purchase, sale, or pledge of an eligible obligation. This payment is permissible if the board of directors establishes a written policy and internal controls for the incentive or bonus program and monitors compliance with the policy and controls at least annually; and

Payment by a person other than the credit union of compensation to a volunteer official, non-senior management, employee, or his or her immediate family member, for a service or activity performed outside the credit union provided that the credit union, the official, employee, or his or her immediate family member has not made a referral.

Business associates and family members. All transactions under this section with business associates or family members not specifically prohibited by subdivision (g)(1) of this section must be conducted at arm’s length and in the interest of the credit union.

Definitions.

“Compensation” includes non-monetary items, except those of nominal value.

“Immediate family member” means a spouse or other family member living in the same household.

“Official” means any member of the board of directors or a volunteer committee.

“Person” means an individual or an organization.

“Senior management employee” means the credit union’s chief executive officer (typically, this individual holds the title of President or Treasurer/Manager), any assistant chief executive officers (e.g., Assistant President, Vice President, or Assistant Treasurer/Manager), and the chief financial officer (Comptroller).

“Volunteer official” means an official of a credit union who does not receive compensation from the credit union solely for his or her service as an official.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 347, § 3; P.L. 2011, ch. 387, § 3; P.L. 2012, ch. 299, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 343, § 1.

19-5-16.
Maximum aggregate liability of one person or company.

A credit union shall not permit any person or entity to borrow or guaranty, directly or indirectly, an amount(s), in the aggregate, that exceeds one percent (1%) of its total assets or twenty percent (20%) of the total unimpaired capital, whichever is greater. This limit shall not apply to a loan or loans secured by pledged shares or deposits in the credit union.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 43.

19-5-17.
Compensation or loans to officers.

No member of the board of directors or member of either the credit or supervisory committee shall directly or indirectly borrow from or become surety for any loan or advance made by the credit union, except that any member of the board of directors or any member from either of the committees may borrow from the credit union up to the amount of shares and deposits pledged for the loan or upon prior authorization and approval by the board of directors.

Any credit union may pay to each of the members of the board of directors, credit committee, and supervisory committee for his or her services as a member of the board or committee(s) a sum that may, from time to time, be fixed by the members at an annual meeting. No officers, directors, or employees may receive any other compensation or fee for services provided to the credit union beyond their compensation as officers, directors, and/or employees.

The director, or the director’s designee, shall promulgate regulations relating to loans to officers and directors of credit unions. The regulations shall provide for limitations and requirements similar to federal regulations governing loans to officers and directors of financial institutions.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 43.

19-5-18.
Expulsion of members.

Credit union management may expel from the credit union any member who has not fulfilled his or her duties toward the credit union; or who has been convicted of a criminal offense; or who neglects or refuses to comply with the provisions of this chapter or of the credit union’s bylaws; or who habitually neglects to pay debts; or who shall become insolvent or bankrupt; or who shall have deceived the credit union with regard to the use of borrowed money, but no member shall be expelled until credit union management has provided the member a notice in writing of the charges against him or her. The member shall have the right to file a written appeal to the board of directors to reconsider the expulsion notice. The written appeal must be filed within ten (10) business days of the receipt of expulsion notice. No such expulsion shall operate to relieve the member from any remaining liability to the credit union.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 43; P.L. 2017, ch. 8, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 22, § 1.

19-5-19.
Dividends.

At those intervals that the board of directors may authorize, and after provision for required reserves, the board of directors may declare a dividend to be paid at different rates on different types of shares, at different rates and maturity dates in the case of share certificates, and at different rates on different types of share draft accounts. Dividends may be declared, in whole or in part, from profits or undivided earnings. Dividends credited may be accrued on various types of shares, share certificates, and share draft accounts as authorized by the board of directors.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 43.

19-5-20.
Regular reserve.

Each credit union shall establish and maintain a regular reserve, as provided by the Federal Credit Union Act, 12 U.S.C. § 1751 et seq. The director, or the director’s designee, shall approve or deny any charges to the reserve.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 43.

19-5-21.
Destruction of records.

A credit union may, in accordance with rules and regulations that the director, or the director’s designee, may adopt, destroy its records that have become obsolete.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 43.

19-5-22.
Tax on deposits.

The capital stock, corporate franchises, and personal property, but not the real estate, of credit unions shall be exempt from taxation; provided, however, that every credit union shall annually pay to the general treasurer forty cents (40¢) on each one hundred dollars ($100) deposited with the credit union in the same manner as in financial institutions, the sums to be ascertained from a report to be made by the credit union to the director, or the director’s designee, on or before the fifteenth day in July of each year, of the total amount of the deposits in the credit union on the last business day in June in that year, and to be paid on or before the first Monday in August.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 43.

19-5-23.
Conversion.

A credit union may be converted into a federal credit union, and a federal credit union may be converted into a credit union, by complying with all the requirements of applicable federal and state law.

A federal credit union shall become a credit union when its agreement to form has been approved by the director, or the director’s designee, under this chapter and when it has filed a copy of its agreement to form with the national credit union administration and complied with all other requirements of federal law.

A credit union shall become a federal credit union upon the granting of a federal credit union charter to it and the completion of all other requirements of federal law necessary to be completed to become an operating federal credit union, and upon the filing with the director, or the director’s designee, a certified vote of the majority of the credit union members present at a meeting called, in accordance with the credit union’s bylaws, for the purpose of considering a conversion to a federal charter. The converting credit union shall then file with the director, or the director’s designee, a certified copy of the federal credit union charter and shall surrender its copy of its agreement to form, or file proof that the agreement to form has been lost.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 43.

19-5-24.
Merger.

Any credit union may, with approval of the director, or the director’s designee, merge with another credit union under the agreement to form of the surviving credit union, pursuant to any plan agreed upon by a two thirds (2/3) vote of those members of the board of directors of each credit union joining in the merger present at a meeting called for that purpose. Additionally, the merger must be approved by the affirmative vote of members representing two thirds (2/3) of the members present of the credit union to be merged, who are eligible to vote pursuant to the bylaws of the credit union, either at a meeting of the members duly called for that purpose or in writing, and if the merger has a significant impact on the surviving credit union, as determined by the director, or the director’s designee, the merger must also be approved by the affirmative vote of members representing two thirds (2/3) of the members present of the surviving credit union, who are eligible to vote pursuant to the bylaws of the credit union, either at a meeting of the members duly called for that purpose or in writing. The credit union being merged shall be required to mail notice of the meeting to its members. Notice of the members’ meeting shall be mailed to all members of the surviving credit union in the discretion of the director, or the director’s designee. The director, or the director’s designee, may waive any or all of the foregoing requirements with respect to notice or to votes of members of the merged credit union or the surviving credit union in order to avert insolvency or imminent failure.

Upon approval by the director, or the director’s designee, and after the votes by the boards of directors and approval of the members of the credit union to be merged, the president and clerk or secretary of each credit union shall execute, in triplicate, a certificate of merger that shall set forth all of the following:

The time and place of the meeting of the board of directors at which the plan was agreed upon;

The vote in favor of adoption of the plan;

A copy of the resolution or other action by which the plan was agreed upon;

The time and place of the meeting of the members at which the plan agreed upon was approved, if applicable;

The vote by which the plan was approved by the members, if applicable; and

The date the merger was approved by the director, or the director’s designee.

The certificates, in triplicate, and a copy of the plan of merger agreed upon shall be forwarded to the director, or the director’s designee, and a copy of the certificate, certified by the director, shall be returned to the merging credit unions within thirty (30) days. Upon any such merger so effected, all property, property rights, and interest of the merged credit union shall vest in the surviving credit union without deed, endorsement, or other instrument of transfer, and all debts, obligations, and liabilities of the merged credit union shall be deemed to have been assumed by the surviving credit union under whose agreement to form the merger was effected.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 43; P.L. 1997, ch. 98, § 5; P.L. 2001, ch. 128, § 3.

19-5-25.
Exercise of same powers as federal credit unions.

A credit union may engage in any activity authorized by law or regulation for federal credit unions that, in the opinion of the director, or the director’s designee, is not unsafe and unsound for the credit union.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 43.

19-5-26.
Liquidity reserves.

Every credit union shall maintain liquidity reserves equal to an amount as determined in the credit union’s liquidity and funds management policy as established and adopted by the board of directors of the credit union. Failure to adopt an adequate funds management policy shall be considered an unsafe and unsound practice.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 43.

19-5-27.
Interstate credit unions.

A credit union chartered in another state shall be permitted to do business in Rhode Island if credit unions may do business in the other state, under terms and conditions no more onerous than the laws of the state of Rhode Island, as determined by the director, or the director’s designee. The standards for interstate activities shall be the same as those for financial institutions.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 43.

19-5-28.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter or the application of this chapter to any person or circumstances is held invalid or unconstitutional, the invalidity or unconstitutionality shall not affect other provisions or applications of this chapter that can be given effect without the invalid or unconstitutional provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are declared to be severable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 43.